West Virginia, session 2025, HB2548.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia ARTICLE 3. STATE SUPERINTENDENT OF SCHOOLS. §18-3-3. General supervision of schools. (a) The State Superintendent of Schools shall have general supervision of the free schools of the state, and shall be the chief executive officer of the state Board of Education. He The State Superintendent of Schools shall be charged with the general supervision of all county and city superintendents of free schools county boards and of county and district boards of education within the state, except as provided in article nine, chapter six §6-9-1, et seq. of this code. He The State Superintendent of Schools shall prescribe the forms and cause to be prepared and printed all blanks necessary for carrying out oversee all the details of the school system of the state, and of the rules of the state Board of Education, so as to secure the uniform operation of the same throughout the state. In respect to general school statistics, such forms and blanks shall conform as nearly as may be to the forms and blanks recommended by the United States bureau of education. The state superintendent shall also cause such forms and blanks to be forwarded to all school officers and other persons whose duty or right it is to use them.(b) The State Superintendent shall report annually to the Legislative Oversight Commission on Education Accountability regarding the implementation of state board rules in each county school district.(1) If a county is found in violation of proper implementation of any rule, the State Superintendent shall provide a plan to ensure full implementation of the rule and the timeline therefore. (2) If a county continues to be in violation of state board rules, school aid funding may be withheld from that county. Bill Status  | Bill Tracking  | Legacy WV Code  | Bulletin Board  | District Maps  | Senate Roster  | House Roster  | Live  | Blog  | Jobs  | Links  | Home